TagsCloudVisualization/dictionaries/Russian-English.aff
SFX R Y 14
SFX R 0 rs e
SFX R 0 r's e
SFX R 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX R 0 sers [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX R 0 ser's [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX R 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX R 0 ters [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX R 0 ter's [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX R 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX R 0 vers [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX R 0 ver's [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX R 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX R 0 zers [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX R 0 zer's [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX r Y 1
SFX r y ier [^aeiou]y

SFX R Y 1
SFX R y ier [^aeiou]y

SFX r Y 2
SFX r y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX r y ier's [^aeiou]y

SFX R Y 6
SFX R y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX R y ier's [^aeiou]y
SFX R сть в сть
SFX R сться вшись сться
SFX R ть в [аеиоуыя]ть
SFX R ться вшись [аеиоуыя]ться

SFX S Y 3
SFX S 0 es [cs]h
SFX S 0 es [sxz]
SFX S 0 es [sxzh]

SFX s Y 12
SFX s 0 iser [^aemsy]
SFX s 0 iser [^i]s
SFX s 0 iser [^u]m
SFX s 0 iser [aeiou]y
SFX s 0 isers [^aemsy]
SFX s 0 iser's [^aemsy]
SFX s 0 isers [^i]s
SFX s 0 iser's [^i]s
SFX s 0 isers [^u]m
SFX s 0 iser's [^u]m
SFX s 0 isers [aeiou]y
SFX s 0 iser's [aeiou]y

SFX S Y 6
SFX S 0 s [^ae]u
SFX S 0 s [^cs]h
SFX S 0 s [^hsuxyz]
SFX S 0 s [^sxzhy]
SFX S 0 s [ae]u
SFX S 0 s [aeiou]y

SFX s Y 3
SFX s 0 tiser a
SFX s 0 tisers a
SFX s 0 tiser's a

SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 x [ae]u

SFX s Y 15
SFX s e iser [^l]e
SFX s e iser [aeiou]le
SFX s e isers [^l]e
SFX s e iser's [^l]e
SFX s e isers [aeiou]le
SFX s e iser's [aeiou]le
SFX s le iliser [^aeiou]le
SFX s le ilisers [^aeiou]le
SFX s le iliser's [^aeiou]le
SFX s s ser is
SFX s s sers is
SFX s s ser's is
SFX s um iser um
SFX s um isers um
SFX s um iser's um

SFX S Y 1
SFX S y ies [^aeiou]y

SFX s Y 3
SFX s y iser [^aeiou]y
SFX s y isers [^aeiou]y
SFX s y iser's [^aeiou]y

SFX S Y 40
SFX S ённый ена ённый
SFX S ённый ено ённый
SFX S ённый ены ённый
SFX S ий 0 [гжчхщ]ий
SFX S ий а [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX S ий е [жчщ]ий
SFX S ий и [гжкхчщ]ий
SFX S ий о [гкх]ий
SFX S йкий ек йкий
SFX S йный ен йный
SFX S кий к [аеёиоуы]кий
SFX S кий к [аеиоуы]кий
SFX S кий ок [^аеёийоуыь]кий
SFX S кий ок [^аеийоуыь]кий
SFX S нный н нный
SFX S ный а [^ё]нный
SFX S ный а нный
SFX S ный ен [^еёйлнь]ный
SFX S ный ен [^ейлнь]ный
SFX S ный н [её]ный
SFX S ный н еный
SFX S ный на [^н]ный
SFX S ный но [^н]ный
SFX S ный ны [^н]ный
SFX S ный о [^ё]нный
SFX S ный о нный
SFX S ный он лный
SFX S ный ы [^ё]нный
SFX S ный ы нный
SFX S ой 0 ой
SFX S ой а ой
SFX S ой и [гх]ой
SFX S ой о ой
SFX S ой ы [^гх]ой
SFX S ый 0 [^н]ый
SFX S ый а [^н]ый
SFX S ый о [^н]ый
SFX S ый ы [^н]ый
SFX S ький ек ький
SFX S ьный ен ьный

SFX T Y 17
SFX T 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 best [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 dest [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 est [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 est [^ey]
SFX T 0 est [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 fest [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX T 0 gest [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX t Y 8
SFX t 0 isability [^aemsy]
SFX t 0 isability [^i]s
SFX t 0 isability [^u]m
SFX t 0 isability [aeiou]y
SFX t 0 isable [^aemsy]
SFX t 0 isable [^i]s
SFX t 0 isable [^u]m
SFX t 0 isable [aeiou]y

SFX T Y 20
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 lest [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 mest [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 nest [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 pest [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 r e
SFX T 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 rest [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 sest [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 st e
SFX T 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX T 0 test [^aeio][aeiou]t

SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 tisability a
SFX t 0 tisable a

SFX T Y 4
SFX T 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 vest [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX T 0 zest [^aeio][aeiou]z

SFX t Y 10
SFX t e isability [^l]e
SFX t e isability [aeiou]le
SFX t e isable [^l]e
SFX t e isable [aeiou]le
SFX t le ilisability [^aeiou]le
SFX t le ilisable [^aeiou]le
SFX t s sability is
SFX t s sable is
SFX t um isability um
SFX t um isable um

SFX T Y 2
SFX T y ier [^aeiou]y
SFX T y iest [^aeiou]y

SFX t Y 2
SFX t y isability [^aeiou]y
SFX t y isable [^aeiou]y

SFX T Y 38
SFX T ать и [жч]ать
SFX T аться ись [жч]аться
SFX T евать уй [жшщчц]евать
SFX T евать уйте [жшщчц]евать
SFX T евать юй [^жшщчц]евать
SFX T евать юйте [^жшщчц]евать
SFX T еваться уйся [жшщчц]еваться
SFX T еваться уйтесь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX T еваться юйся [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX T еваться юйтесь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX T еть и еть
SFX T еть ите еть
SFX T еться ись еться
SFX T еться итесь еться
SFX T ить й [аео]ить
SFX T ить йте [аео]ить
SFX T ить ь [^аео]ить
SFX T ить ьте [^аео]ить
SFX T иться йся [аео]иться
SFX T иться йтесь [аео]иться
SFX T иться ься [^аео]иться
SFX T иться ьтесь [^аео]иться
SFX T овать уй овать
SFX T овать уйте овать
SFX T оваться уйся оваться
SFX T оваться уйтесь оваться
SFX T сать ши сать
SFX T сать шите сать
SFX T саться шись саться
SFX T саться шитесь саться
SFX T уть ь уть
SFX T уть ьте уть
SFX T уться ься уться
SFX T уться ьтесь уться
SFX T ять й [аеоу]ять
SFX T ять йте [аеоу]ять
SFX T яться йся [аеоу]яться
SFX T яться йтесь [аеоу]яться

SFX u Y 15
SFX u 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty]
SFX u 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l
SFX u 0 iveness [st]
SFX u 0 lativeness [aeiou]l
SFX u 0 tiveness [aio]
SFX u b ptiveness b
SFX u be ptiveness be
SFX u d siveness d
SFX u de siveness de
SFX u e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e
SFX u e iveness [st]e
SFX u e ptiveness me
SFX u e tiveness ce
SFX u ke cativeness ke
SFX u y icativeness y

SFX U Y 162
SFX U ать ем дать
SFX U ать ём дать
SFX U ать ет дать
SFX U ать ёт дать
SFX U ать ете дать
SFX U ать ёте дать
SFX U ать ешь дать
SFX U ать ёшь дать
SFX U ать им [жшщч]ать
SFX U ать ит [жшщч]ать
SFX U ать ите [жшщч]ать
SFX U ать ишь [жшщч]ать
SFX U ать у [жшщч]ать
SFX U ать у дать
SFX U ать ут дать
SFX U аться емся даться
SFX U аться ёмся даться
SFX U аться етесь даться
SFX U аться ётесь даться
SFX U аться ется даться
SFX U аться ётся даться
SFX U аться ешься даться
SFX U аться ёшься даться
SFX U аться имся [жшщч]аться
SFX U аться итесь [жшщч]аться
SFX U аться ится [жшщч]аться
SFX U аться ишься [жшщч]аться
SFX U аться усь [жшщч]аться
SFX U аться усь даться
SFX U аться утся даться
SFX U вать ем авать
SFX U вать ём авать
SFX U вать ет авать
SFX U вать ёт авать
SFX U вать ете авать
SFX U вать ёте авать
SFX U вать ешь авать
SFX U вать ёшь авать
SFX U вать ю авать
SFX U вать ют авать
SFX U ваться емся аваться
SFX U ваться ёмся аваться
SFX U ваться етесь аваться
SFX U ваться ётесь аваться
SFX U ваться ется аваться
SFX U ваться ётся аваться
SFX U ваться ешься аваться
SFX U ваться ёшься аваться
SFX U ваться юсь аваться
SFX U ваться ются аваться
SFX U евать уем [жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать ует [жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать уете [жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать уешь [жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать ую [жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать уют [жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать юем [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать юет [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать юете [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать юешь [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать юю [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U евать юют [^жшщчц]евать
SFX U еваться уемся [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться уетесь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться уется [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться уешься [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться уюсь [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться уются [жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться юемся [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться юетесь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться юется [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться юешься [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться ююсь [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U еваться юются [^жшщчц]еваться
SFX U овать уем овать
SFX U овать ует овать
SFX U овать уете овать
SFX U овать уешь овать
SFX U овать ую овать
SFX U овать уют овать
SFX U оваться уемся оваться
SFX U оваться уетесь оваться
SFX U оваться уется оваться
SFX U оваться уешься оваться
SFX U оваться уюсь оваться
SFX U оваться уются оваться
SFX U ть ем [^аеоу]ять
SFX U ть ет [^аеоу]ять
SFX U ть ете [^аеоу]ять
SFX U ть ешь [^аеоу]ять
SFX U ть т [жшщч]ать
SFX U ть т оять
SFX U ть т уть
SFX U ть ю [^аеоу]ять
SFX U ть ют [^аеоу]ять
SFX U ться емся [^аеоу]яться
SFX U ться етесь [^аеоу]яться
SFX U ться ется [^аеоу]яться
SFX U ться ешься [^аеоу]яться
SFX U ться сь уться
SFX U ться юсь [^аеоу]яться
SFX U ться ются [^аеоу]яться
SFX U уть ем уть
SFX U уть ём уть
SFX U уть ет уть
SFX U уть ёт уть
SFX U уть ете уть
SFX U уть ёте уть
SFX U уть ешь уть
SFX U уть ёшь уть
SFX U уть у уть
SFX U уться емся уться
SFX U уться ёмся уться
SFX U уться етесь уться
SFX U уться ётесь уться
SFX U уться ется уться
SFX U уться ётся уться
SFX U уться ешься уться
SFX U уться ёшься уться
SFX U чь гу чь
SFX U чь гут чь
SFX U чь жем чь
SFX U чь жём чь
SFX U чь жет чь
SFX U чь жёт чь
SFX U чь жете чь
SFX U чь жёте чь
SFX U чь жешь чь
SFX U чь жёшь чь
SFX U чься гусь чься
SFX U чься гутся чься
SFX U чься жемся чься
SFX U чься жёмся чься
SFX U чься жетесь чься
SFX U чься жётесь чься
SFX U чься жется чься
SFX U чься жётся чься
SFX U чься жешься чься
SFX U чься жёшься чься
SFX U ься ся [жшщч]аться
SFX U ься ся ояться
SFX U ься ся уться
SFX U ять ем [аеу]ять
SFX U ять ет [аеу]ять
SFX U ять ете [аеу]ять
SFX U ять ешь [аеу]ять
SFX U ять им оять
SFX U ять ит оять
SFX U ять ите оять
SFX U ять ишь оять
SFX U ять ю [аеоу]ять
SFX U ять ют [аеу]ять
SFX U яться емся [аеу]яться
SFX U яться етесь [аеу]яться
SFX U яться ется [аеу]яться
SFX U яться ешься [аеу]яться
SFX U яться имся ояться
SFX U яться итесь ояться
SFX U яться ится ояться
SFX U яться ишься ояться
SFX U яться юсь [аеоу]яться
SFX U яться ются [аеу]яться

SFX V Y 2
SFX V 0 ative [^abdeilosty]
SFX V 0 ative [^aeiou]l

SFX v Y 2
SFX v 0 atively [^abdeilosty]
SFX v 0 atively [^aeiou]l

SFX V Y 2
SFX V 0 ive [^e]
SFX V 0 ive [st]

SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 ively [st]

SFX V Y 1
SFX V 0 lative [aeiou]l

SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 latively [aeiou]l

SFX V Y 1
SFX V 0 tive [aio]

SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 tively [aio]

SFX V Y 1
SFX V b ptive b

SFX v Y 1
SFX v b ptively b

SFX V Y 1
SFX V be ptive be

SFX v Y 1
SFX v be ptively be

SFX V Y 1
SFX V d sive d

SFX v Y 1
SFX v d sively d

SFX V Y 1
SFX V de sive de

SFX v Y 1
SFX v de sively de

SFX V Y 1
SFX V e ative [^bcdkmst]e

SFX v Y 1
SFX v e atively [^bcdkmst]e

SFX V Y 2
SFX V e ive [st]e
SFX V e ive e

SFX v Y 1
SFX v e ively [st]e

SFX V Y 1
SFX V e ptive me

SFX v Y 1
SFX v e ptively me

SFX V Y 1
SFX V e tive ce

SFX v Y 1
SFX v e tively ce

SFX V Y 1
SFX V ke cative ke

SFX v Y 1
SFX v ke catively ke

SFX V Y 1
SFX V y icative y

SFX v Y 1
SFX v y icatively y
